Washington statutes.
RCW 35.37.027

Validation of preexisting obligations by former city.

All elections for the validation of any debt created by any city or town which has since become consolidated with any other city or town shall be by ballot, and the vote shall be taken in the new consolidated city as constituted at the time of the election.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.37.027. Prior: 1897 c 84 s 12; RRS s 5646.]

NOTES:

Elections: Title 29A RCW.